Vermont, session 2025-2026, S40.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. § 9 is amended to read:
§ 9. EMERGENCY POWERS OF GOVERNOR
Subject to the provisions of this chapter, in the event of an all-hazards event
in or directed upon the United States or Canada that causes or may cause
substantial damage or injury to persons or property within the State in any
manner, the Governor may declare a state of emergency within the entire State
or any portion or portions of the State. Thereafter, the Governor shall have and
VT LEG #379767 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.40
2025 Page 2 of 3
may exercise for as long as the Governor determines the emergency to exist the
following additional powers within such area or areas:
* * *
(11) In consultation with the Secretary of Natural Resources or
designee, to authorize the Agency to issue temporary emergency permits, with
appropriate conditions to minimize significant adverse environmental impacts,
after limited or no opportunity for public comment, allowing site preparation
for, construction of, or operation of an electric transmission facility or a
generating facility necessary to ensure the stability or reliability of the electric
system or a natural gas facility. A permit issued under this subdivision shall be
subject to conditions required by the Governor and shall be valid for the
duration of the declared emergency plus 180 days, or such lesser overall term
as determined by the Governor. Upon the expiration of a temporary
emergency permit under this subdivision, if any applicable permits have not
been issued by the Secretary or the Commissioner of Environmental
Conservation, the Secretary may seek enforcement under applicable law.
(12) In consultation with the Secretary of Natural Resources or
designee, to authorize the Agency to waive applicable permits and restrictions
under 10 V.S.A. chapter 47 or the Vermont Water Quality Standards to allow
dams within the State to draw down water levels in anticipation of a flood
event that is likely to cause substantial damage or injury to persons or property.
VT LEG #379767 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.40
2025 Page 3 of 3
Waivers may only be issued if the Governor, in consultation with the Secretary
of Natural Resources or designee, has significant reason to believe doing so
will decrease the risk of substantial damage to persons or property within the
State. Dam operators operating under a waiver shall be required make every
effort to minimize the environmental impact of a water level drawdown under
the authorized waiver.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379767 v.1